Hawaii statutes.
§286-84 Revocation of approval. When
the director of transportation has reason to believe that a device approved
under section 286-83 as being sold commercially does not comply with the
requirements of section 286-83, the director may, after giving thirty days'
previous notice to the person who has received the approval for the device in
this State, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the approved
device. After the hearing the director shall determine whether the approved
device meets the requirements of section 286-83. If the device does not meet
the requirements of section 286-83, the director shall give notice to the
person who has received the approval for the device in this State.

If at the expiration of ninety days after such
notice, the person who has received the approval for the device has failed to
satisfy the director that the device as thereafter to be sold meets the
requirements of section 286-83, the director shall suspend or revoke the
approval issued therefor until or unless the device is resubmitted to and
retested by an authorized testing agency and is found to meet the requirements
of section 286-83, and may require that all such devices sold since the
notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with
the requirements of section 286-83. The director may at the time of retest
purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets
of such approval devices, and if such device upon retest fails to meet the
requirements of section 286-83, the director may refuse to renew the approval
of the device. [L 1971, c 110, pt of §3; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §12; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next